Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4794.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 156. (1) Within Not later than 15 days after his the appointment or after the final canvass of his the election, each person individual elected or appointed as a member of the board of trustees of a community college district shall file with the secretary of the board of trustees his the oath of office and his acceptance of office, accompanied by a written affidavit setting forth the fact of his the individual's eligibility as provided in section 151. Each person individual elected or appointed to the board of trustees of any community college district shall take and subscribe the following oath or affirmation: "I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support the constitution Constitution of the United States and the constitution of this state, and that I will faithfully discharge the duties of the office of member of the board of trustees according to the best of my ability." (2) Any A member elected to the first board of trustees of a community college district shall file his acceptance of office, the affidavit of eligibility and oath of office with the secretary of the intermediate board of education of the county having the highest valuation within the community college district. Sec. 157. The office of a member of the board of trustees shall become becomes vacant immediately without declaration of any officer or any acceptance of the board of trustees or its the board's members , upon the any of the following: (a) The death of the incumbent. , or his (b) The incumbent being is adjudicated insane or being is found to be mentally incompetent by the proper court. ; his (c) The incumbent's resignation. ; his (d) The incumbent's removal from office. ; his (e) The incumbent's conviction of a felony. ; his (f) The incumbent's election or appointment being is declared void by a competent tribunal. ; his (g) The incumbent's refusal or neglect to file his acceptance of office, or his refusal or neglect to take and subscribe to the constitutional oath of office and deposit the same oath in the manner and within the time prescribed by law. ; his (h) The incumbent's ceasing to possess the legal qualifications for holding office, including his the residence qualification. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4793 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.